Wisconsin, session 2025, SB885.
do enact as follows:SB885,11Section 1. 551.102 (5g) of the statutes is created to read:SB885,2,42551.102 (5g) “Digital asset” means any digital representation of value that is 3recorded on a cryptographically secured distributed ledger or other similar 4technology.SB885,25Section 2. 551.102 (17r) of the statutes is created to read:SB885,2,86551.102 (17r) “Node” means software run on a computer that does any of the 7following but that does not exercise discretion over transactions initiated by an end 8user of a blockchain protocol:SB885,2,109(a) Communicates with other devices or participants on a blockchain to 10maintain consensus and integrity of that blockchain.SB885,2,1111(b) Creates and validates blocks of transactions.SB885,2,1212(c) Contains and updates a copy of a blockchain.SB885,313Section 3. 551.102 (28) (i) and (j) of the statutes are created to read:SB885,2,1414551.102 (28) (i) Does not include staking.SB885,2,1515(j) Does not include staking as a service.SB885,416Section 4. 551.102 (30m) and (30p) of the statutes are created to read:SB885,2,2017551.102 (30m) “Staking” means the act of committing or locking a digital 18asset to support the security and operations of a blockchain protocol that uses a 19proof-of-stake consensus mechanism by either operating a validator node or 20delegating the digital asset to a validator.SB885,3,321(30p) “Staking as a service” means the provision of technical solutions by a 223rd-party service provider, which may be in conjunction with custodial services, to 1token owners to enable their participation in staking, including the operation of the 2necessary staking software and validator node operations on behalf of a token 3owner to enable the earning of rewards from a blockchain network.SB885,3,44